Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.050

Real estate appraisers—Report.

The corporate authority is authorized to engage duly qualified real estate appraisers, for the purpose of determining the value, or legal damages, if any, to any person, owning or having any legal or equitable interest in any real property who contends that he or she would suffer damage if a projected mall were established; in connection therewith the city shall take into account any increment in value that may result from the establishment of the mall. The appraisers shall submit their findings in writing to the chief executive of the city.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2122; 1965 c 7 s 35.71.050. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 5.]